Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 3.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201471-4826
Applicability of act.

The
Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act applies to an anatomical gift or amendment
to, revocation of, or refusal to make an anatomical gift, whenever made.

Laws 2010, LB1036, § 3.